Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.342

General obligation bond retirement fund—Abolished.

From and after the first day of May, 1955, the general obligation bond retirement fund is abolished.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.342. Prior: 1955 c 330 s 3.]